Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.71, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 55. new text end new text begin Construction materials purchased by contractors; exemption for certain entities. new text end new text begin (a) Building, construction, or reconstruction materials, supplies, and equipment purchased by a contractor, subcontractor, or builder and used or consumed in or incorporated into buildings or facilities used principally by the following entities are exempt: new text end new text begin (1) school districts, as defined under section 297A.70, subdivision 2, paragraph (c); new text end new text begin (2) local governments, as defined under section 297A.70, subdivision 2, paragraph (d); new text end new text begin (3) hospitals and nursing homes owned and operated by political subdivisions of the state, as listed in section 297A.70, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (3); new text end new text begin (4) county law libraries under chapter 134A and public libraries, regional public library systems, and multicounty, multitype library systems as defined in section 134.001; new text end new text begin (5) nonprofit groups, as defined under section 297A.70, subdivision 4; new text end new text begin (6) hospitals, outpatient surgical centers, and critical access dental providers, as defined under section 297A.70, subdivision 7; and new text end new text begin (7) nursing homes and boarding care homes, as defined under section 297A.70, subdivision 18. new text end new text begin (b) Materials, supplies, and equipment used in the construction, reconstruction, repair, maintenance, or improvement of public infrastructure of any kind including but not limited to roads, bridges, culverts, drinking water facilities, and wastewater facilities purchased by a contractor or subcontractor of the following entities are exempt: new text end new text begin (1) school districts, as defined under section 297A.70, subdivision 2, paragraph (c); or new text end new text begin (2) local governments, as defined under section 297A.70, subdivision 2, paragraph (d). new text end new text begin (c) The tax on purchases exempt under this subdivision must be imposed and collected as if the rate under section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied, and then refunded in the manner provided in section 297A.75. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Tax collected. The tax on the gross receipts from the sale of the following exempt items must be imposed and collected as if the sale were taxable and the rate under section 297A.62, subdivision 1, applied. The exempt items include: (1) building materials for an agricultural processing facility exempt under section 297A.71, subdivision 13; (2) building materials for mineral production facilities exempt under section 297A.71, subdivision 14; (3) building materials for correctional facilities under section 297A.71, subdivision 3; (4) building materials used in a residence for veterans with a disability exempt under section 297A.71, subdivision 11; (5) elevators and building materials exempt under section 297A.71, subdivision 12; (6) materials and supplies for qualified low-income housing under section 297A.71, subdivision 23; (7) materials, supplies, and equipment for municipal electric utility facilities under section 297A.71, subdivision 35; (8) equipment and materials used for the generation, transmission, and distribution of electrical energy and an aerial camera package exempt under section 297A.68, subdivision 37; (9) commuter rail vehicle and repair parts under section 297A.70, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (10); (10) materials, supplies, and equipment for construction or improvement of projects and facilities under section 297A.71, subdivision 40; (11) enterprise information technology equipment and computer software for use in a qualified data center exempt under section 297A.68, subdivision 42; (12) materials, supplies, and equipment for qualifying capital projects under section 297A.71, subdivision 44, paragraph (a), clause (1), and paragraph (b); (13) items purchased for use in providing critical access dental services exempt under section 297A.70, subdivision 7, paragraph (c); (14) items and services purchased under a business subsidy agreement for use or consumption primarily in greater Minnesota exempt under section 297A.68, subdivision 44; (15) building materials, equipment, and supplies for constructing or replacing real property exempt under section 297A.71, subdivisions 49; 50, paragraph (b); and 51; (16) building materials, equipment, and supplies for qualifying capital projects under section 297A.71, subdivision 52; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (17) building materials, equipment, and supplies for constructing, remodeling, expanding, or improving a fire station, police station, or related facilities exempt under section 297A.71, subdivision 53deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (18) building construction or reconstruction materials, supplies, and equipment purchased by an entity eligible under section 297A.71, subdivision 55. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.75, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Refund; eligible persons. Upon application on forms prescribed by the commissioner, a refund equal to the tax paid on the gross receipts of the exempt items must be paid to the applicant. Only the following persons may apply for the refund: (1) for subdivision 1, clauses (1), (2), and (13), the applicant must be the purchaser; (2) for subdivision 1, clause (3), the applicant must be the governmental subdivision; (3) for subdivision 1, clause (4), the applicant must be the recipient of the benefits provided in United States Code, title 38, chapter 21; (4) for subdivision 1, clause (5), the applicant must be the owner of the homestead property; (5) for subdivision 1, clause (6), the owner of the qualified low-income housing project; (6) for subdivision 1, clause (7), the applicant must be a municipal electric utility or a joint venture of municipal electric utilities; (7) for subdivision 1, clauses (8), (11), and (14), the owner of the qualifying business; (8) for subdivision 1, clauses (9), (10), (12), (16), and (17), the applicant must be the governmental entity that owns or contracts for the project or facility; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (9) for subdivision 1, clause (15), the applicant must be the owner or developer of the building or projectdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (10) for subdivision 1, clause (18), the applicant must be the entity eligible under section 297A.71, subdivision 55. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.75, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Application. (a) The application must include sufficient information to permit the commissioner to verify the tax paid. If the tax was paid by a contractor, subcontractor, or builder, under subdivision 1, clauses (3) to (12) or (14) to deleted text begin (17)deleted text end new text begin (18)new text end , the contractor, subcontractor, or builder must furnish to the refund applicant a statement including the cost of the exempt items and the taxes paid on the items unless otherwise specifically provided by this subdivision. The provisions of sections 289A.40 and 289A.50 apply to refunds under this section. (b) An applicant may not file more than two applications per calendar year for refunds for taxes paid on capital equipment exempt under section 297A.68, subdivision 5. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end